Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.085

Legislative intent—Investments.

In order that the intent of the legislature may be made clear with respect to investments, but without restricting the necessary flexibility that must exist for successful investing of the retirement and pension funds, the legislature makes this declaration of its desire that the investment authority shall give primary consideration to dealing with brokerage firms which maintain offices in the state of Washington so that the investment programs may make a meaningful contribution to the economy of the state. It is further the desire of the legislature that the retirement and pension funds shall be used as much as reasonably possible to benefit and expand the business and economic climate within the state of Washington so long as such use would be consistent with sound investment policy.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 211 s 3.]